Utah statutes.
58-46a-306.   Holders of license under predecessor law.
(1)  An individual who has been issued a Utah license as a hearing aid
specialist prior to July 1, 1994, under any predecessor licensing act may
renew or reinstate that license in accordance with the provisions of Section
58-1-308, under the classification of hearing instrument specialist without
meeting the qualifications for licensure under Subsection 58-46a-302(1) until
September 30, 1996.  After September 30, 1996, an individual may renew or
reinstate a license as a hearing instrument specialist only if the individual
meets the qualification for licensure provided in Subsection 58-46a-302(1).
(2)  An individual who has been issued a Utah temporary license as a hearing
aid specialist under any predecessor licensing act prior to and current as of
July 1, 1994, shall be issued a hearing instrument intern license for a term
of two years and shall be regulated in accordance with all provisions of this
chapter relating to a hearing instrument intern license.  After expiration of
the license, that individual may not practice as a hearing instrument
specialist unless that person qualifies and is licensed as a hearing
instrument specialist or exempted from licensure in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter.
(3)  An individual holding a hearing instrument intern license, prior to and
current as of July 1, 2002:
(a)  is subject to the provisions of Sections 58-46a-302 and 58-46a-302.5; and
(b)  will receive full credit for the number of direct and indirect hours of
supervision prior to July 1, 2001.
